Idaho, session 2026, S1242.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 22-1204, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-1204. DEFINITIONS. As used in this act:
1. The term "commission" means the Idaho potato commission.
2. The term "person" means individual, partnership, corporation, asso-
ciation, grower and/or any other business unit.
3. The term "potatoes" means and includes only potatoes sold or in-
tended for human consumption and grown in the state of Idaho.
4. "Shipment" of potatoes shall be deemed to take place when the pota-
toes are loaded within the state of Idaho, in a car, bulk, truck or other con-
veyance in which the potatoes are to be transported for sale or otherwise.
5. The term "dealer" means and includes any person engaged in the busi-
ness of buying, receiving, processing, or selling potatoes for profit or re-
muneration.
6. The term "shipper" means and includes one who is properly licensed
under federal and state laws, actively engaged in the packing and shipping of
potatoes in the primary channel of trade in interstate commerce in the state
of Idaho, who does not provide the primary management to a growing or pro-
cessing operation, and who ships more than he produces.
7. The term "grower" means one who is actively engaged in the growing
of potatoes on five (5) or more acres in the state of Idaho, and who does not
provide the primary management to a shipping or processing operation.
8. Potatoes shall be deemed to be delivered into the primary channel of
trade when any such potatoes are sold or delivered for shipment, or delivered
for canning and/or processing into by-products.


9. The term "hundredweight" means each one hundred (100) pound unit or
combination of packages making a one hundred (100) pound unit of any shipment
of potatoes based on invoice and/or bill of lading records.
10. The term "processor" means a person who is actively engaged in the
processing of potatoes in the state of Idaho for human consumption.
11. The term "processing" means changing the form of potatoes from the
raw or natural state into a product for human consumption.
12. The term "handler" means and includes any person processing pota-
toes or handling them in the primary channel of trade.
13. The term "tax" means an assessment levied on potatoes covered by
this act for the sole purpose of financing, on behalf of the potato industry
in Idaho, the commission's activities in carrying out the purposes of this
act.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the commis-
sion shall not be authorized to promulgate rules relating to the amendments
to the definitions of the terms "shipper," "grower," and "processor" as pro-
vided for in this act for a period of one (1) year from the effective date of
this act.
SECTION 3. That Section 22-1211A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 22-1215, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.